Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.046

Professional limited liability companies.

(1) A person or group of persons duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services within this state may form and become a member or members of a professional limited liability company under the provisions of this chapter for the purposes of rendering professional service.

(2) A professional limited liability company is subject to all the provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW that apply to a professional corporation. A professional limited liability company's managers, members, agents, and employees are subject to all the provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW that apply to the directors, officers, shareholders, agents, or employees of a professional corporation, except as provided otherwise in this section and RCW 25.15.048.

(3) If the limited liability company's members are required to be licensed to practice such profession, and the limited liability company fails to maintain for itself and for its members practicing in this state a policy of professional liability insurance, bond, or other evidence of financial responsibility of a kind designated by rule by the state insurance commissioner and in the amount of at least one million dollars or a greater amount as the state insurance commissioner may establish by rule for a licensed profession or for any specialty within a profession, taking into account the nature and size of the business, then the limited liability company's members are personally liable to the extent that, had the insurance, bond, or other evidence of responsibility been maintained, it would have covered the liability in question.

(4) For purposes of applying chapter 18.100 RCW to a professional limited liability company, the terms "director" or "officer" means manager, "shareholder" means member, "corporation" means professional limited liability company, "articles of incorporation" means certificate of formation, "shares" or "capital stock" means a limited liability company interest, "incorporator" means the person who executes the certificate of formation, and "bylaws" means the limited liability company agreement.

(5) The name of a professional limited liability company must comply with RCW 23.95.305.

(6) Subject to Article VII of this chapter, the following may be a member of a professional limited liability company and may be the transferee of the interest of an ineligible person or deceased member of the professional limited liability company:

(a) A professional corporation, if its shareholders, directors, and its officers, other than the secretary and the treasurer, are licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same specific professional services as the professional limited liability company;

(b) Another professional limited liability company, if the managers and members of both professional limited liability companies are licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same specific professional services; and

(c) A foreign professional limited liability company, if the managers and members of the foreign professional limited liability company are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same specific professional services in any jurisdiction other than this state as the managers and members of the professional limited liability company.

(7) Formation of a limited liability company under this section does not restrict the application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or any applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18 RCW, including but not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of their credential.

[ 2022 c 42 s 302; 2015 c 176 s 7105; 2015 c 188 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.